apertium-zh_CN-zh_TW.zh_CN.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
   <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod" />
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv" />
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="num" />
    <sdef n="np" />

    <sdef n="alpha" />
    <sdef n="acr" />
    <sdef n="predet" />
    <sdef n="detnt" />
    <sdef n="top" />
    <sdef n="ant" />
    <sdef n="al" />
    <sdef n="cog" />
    <sdef n="atn" />
    <sdef n="enc" />
    <sdef n="pro" />
    <sdef n="tn" />
    <sdef n="re" />
    <sdef n="adj" />
    <sdef n="f" />
    <sdef n="m" />
    <sdef n="mf" />
    <sdef n="preadv" />
    <sdef n="pr" />
    <sdef n="rel" />
    <sdef n="nn" />
    <sdef n="an" />
    <sdef n="aa" />
    <sdef n="ind" />
    <sdef n="itg" />
    <sdef n="det" />
    <sdef n="dem" />
    <sdef n="def" />
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" />
    <sdef n="cnjsub" />
    <sdef n="cnjadv" />
    <sdef n="nt" />
 
    <sdef n="inf" />
    <sdef n="ger" />
    <sdef n="pp" />
    <sdef n="p1" />
    <sdef n="p2" />
    <sdef n="p3" />
    <sdef n="pii" />
    <sdef n="ifi" />
    <sdef n="fti" />
    <sdef n="cni" />
    <sdef n="prs" />
    <sdef n="pis" />
    <sdef n="fts" />
    <sdef n="imp" />
    <sdef n="pos" />
    <sdef n="sp" />
    <sdef n="ref" />
    <sdef n="sup" />
    <sdef n="ord" />
    <sdef n="qnt" />
    <sdef n="pron" />
    <sdef n="ij" />
    <sdef n="sent" />
    <sdef n="cm" />
    <sdef n="lpar" />
    <sdef n="rpar" />
    <sdef n="web" />
    <sdef n="apos" />
    <sdef n="percent" />
    <sdef n="guio" />
    <sdef n="past" />
    <sdef n="sep" />
    <sdef n="sint" />
    <sdef n="email" />
    <sdef n="obj" />
    <sdef n="subj" />
    <sdef n="subs" />
    <sdef n="pprs" />
    <sdef n="gen" />
    <sdef n="vbdo" />
    <sdef n="comp" />
    <sdef n="pres" />
    <sdef n="vaux" />
    <sdef n="sym" />
    <sdef n="ND" />
    <sdef n="GD" />

   </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

<pardef n="我__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>		<r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>们</l>		<r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="楠哥__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="小珊__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="房子__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="爱__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="我的__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="好__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      	<r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="一定__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="非常__preadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="哪里__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="和__cnjcoo">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

	
  </pardefs>

<e lm="我"><i>我</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="你"><i>你</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="您"><i>您</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="他"><i>他</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="她"><i>她</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="它"><i>它</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="咱"><i>咱</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="楠哥"><i>楠哥</i><par n="楠哥__np"/></e>
<e lm="小珊"><i>小珊</i><par n="小珊__np"/></e>
<e lm="小明"><i>小明</i><par n="楠哥__np"/></e>
<e lm="小红"><i>小红</i><par n="小珊__np"/></e>
<e lm="爱">		<i>爱</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="喜欢">		<i>喜欢</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="在">		<i>在</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="玩">		<i>玩</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="玩耍">		<i>玩耍</i><par n="爱__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="今天">		<i>今天</i><par n="一定__adv"/></e>
<e lm="昨天">		<i>昨天</i><par n="一定__adv"/></e>
<e lm="明天">		<i>明天</i><par n="一定__adv"/></e>
<e lm="一起">		<i>一起</i><par n="一定__adv"/></e>
<e lm="哪里">		<i>哪里</i><par n="哪里__adv"/></e>
<e lm="何时">		<i>何时</i><par n="哪里__adv"/></e>
<e lm="我的">           <i>我的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="你的">           <i>你的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="他的">           <i>他的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="她的">           <i>她的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="它的">           <i>它的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="我们的">           <i>我们的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="你们的">           <i>你们的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="他们的">           <i>他们的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="她们的">           <i>她们的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="它们的">           <i>它们的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="好">           <i>好</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="好的">           <i>好的</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="坏">           <i>坏</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="坏的">           <i>坏的</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="大">           <i>大</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="小">           <i>小</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="冷">           <i>冷</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="暖">           <i>暖</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="暖和">           <i>暖和</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="更">             <i>更</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="就像">            <i>就像</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="差不多">            <i>差不多</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="那么">          <i>那么</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="真的">          <i>真的</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="如此">              <i>如此</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="很">             <i>很</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="非常">            <i>非常</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="和">		<i>和</i><par n="和__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="但">		<i>但</i><par n="和__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="但是">		<i>但是</i><par n="和__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="不过">		<i>不过</i><par n="和__cnjcoo"/></e>
		<e lm="房子"><i>房子</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="爸"><i>爸</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="办法"><i>办法</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="杯子"><i>杯子</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="北边"><i>北边</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="本子"><i>本子</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="边"><i>边</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="布"><i>布</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="菜"><i>菜</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="草"><i>草</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="车"><i>车</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="城"><i>城</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="成绩"><i>成绩</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="窗"><i>窗</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="床"><i>床</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="春天"><i>春天</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="词"><i>词</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="错"><i>错</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="打算"><i>打算</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="大夫"><i>大夫</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="道理"><i>道理</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="地方"><i>地方</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="点心"><i>点心</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="电"><i>电</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="电灯"><i>电灯</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="电视"><i>电视</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="东"><i>东</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="东边儿"><i>东边儿</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="冬"><i>冬</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="动物"><i>动物</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="发展"><i>发展</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="法文"><i>法文</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="饭"><i>饭</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="方法"><i>方法</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="方向"><i>方向</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="飞机"><i>飞机</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="风"><i>风</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="服务员"><i>服务员</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="附近"><i>附近</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="钢笔"><i>钢笔</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="歌"><i>歌</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="工厂"><i>工厂</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="公共汽车"><i>公共汽车</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="馆"><i>馆</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="过去"><i>过去</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="汉语"><i>汉语</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="黑板"><i>黑板</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="湖"><i>湖</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="回答"><i>回答</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="火车"><i>火车</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="机器"><i>机器</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="家庭"><i>家庭</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="江"><i>江</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="教育"><i>教育</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="姐姐"><i>姐姐</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="经验"><i>经验</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="句子"><i>句子</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="开始"><i>开始</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="课文"><i>课文</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="老师"><i>老师</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="里边儿"><i>里边儿</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="脸"><i>脸</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="流"><i>流</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="妈妈"><i>妈妈</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="妹妹"><i>妹妹</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="面条儿"><i>面条儿</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="母亲"><i>母亲</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="内"><i>内</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="年纪"><i>年纪</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="农民"><i>农民</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="派"><i>派</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="批评"><i>批评</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="苹果"><i>苹果</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="钱"><i>钱</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="墙"><i>墙</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="秋"><i>秋</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="人们"><i>人们</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="日文"><i>日文</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="商店"><i>商店</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="社会"><i>社会</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="生词"><i>生词</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="师傅"><i>师傅</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="世界"><i>世界</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="手"><i>手</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="树"><i>树</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="水平"><i>水平</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="太阳"><i>太阳</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="体育"><i>体育</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="听写"><i>听写</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="图书馆"><i>图书馆</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="外边儿"><i>外边儿</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="碗"><i>碗</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="危险"><i>危险</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="文艺"><i>文艺</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="午饭"><i>午饭</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="西边儿"><i>西边儿</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="下边儿"><i>下边儿</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="先生"><i>先生</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="小孩儿"><i>小孩儿</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="鞋"><i>鞋</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="心"><i>心</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="星期二"><i>星期二</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="星期六"><i>星期六</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="需要"><i>需要</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="雪"><i>雪</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="羊"><i>羊</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="医生"><i>医生</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="艺术"><i>艺术</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="音乐"><i>音乐</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="影响"><i>影响</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="右"><i>右</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="语言"><i>语言</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="月球"><i>月球</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="早晨"><i>早晨</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="政府"><i>政府</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="中间"><i>中间</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="钟"><i>钟</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="周二"><i>周二</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="周六"><i>周六</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="准备"><i>准备</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="足球"><i>足球</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="昨天"><i>昨天</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="变化"><i>变化</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="代表"><i>代表</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="感冒"><i>感冒</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="花"><i>花</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
